Arkansas statutes. Title 24 Retirement And Pensions
Chapter 7 Retirement of Employees of Schools and Educational Institutions
Subchapter 13
— Teacher Deferred Retirement Option Plan

A.C.R.C. Notes.

References to “this subchapter” in §§ 24-7-1301 — 24-7-1312 and 24-7-1314 may not apply to §§ 24-7-1313 and 24-7-1315 which were enacted subsequently.

Effective Dates.

Acts 1997, No. 118, § 7: July 1, 1997. Emergency clause provided: “Emergency. It is hereby found and determined by the Eighty- First General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that changes are necessary for the effective management and continued financial operation of the Teacher Deferred Retirement Option Plan; that administrative efficiency dictates those changes be made at the beginning of the state fiscal year on July 1st; and that these changes are essential to the protect the financial interests of the membership of the Teacher Retirement System. Therefore, in order to protect the members of the System, an emergency is hereby declared to exist, and this act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, and safety, shall become effective July 1, 1997.”

Acts 1997, No. 953, § 6: July 1, 1997. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the Eighty- First General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that member contributions to the teacher deferred retirement option plan accounts need to be adjusted; that current law does not provide for that option; and changes in the current laws are necessary to continue the operation of the teacher deferred retirement option plan. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist, and this act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, and safety, shall become effective July 1, 1997.”

Acts 1999, No. 773, § 5: Mar. 22, 1999. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the Eighty-second General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that the deferred retirement option (DROP) for the Teacher Retirement System requires no employer contributions by the school districts, that some school districts are unnecessarily expending funds for employees on the DROP, that this threatens the general level of education of all students, especially in small school districts where every dollar is needed, and that this law will immediately correct this situation so school districts will retain all necessary funds for expenditure for the general benefit of the students and not make unnecessary expenditures to benefit certain select employees. Therefore an emergency is declared to exist and this act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall become effective on the date of its approval by the Governor. If the bill is neither approved nor vetoed by the Governor, it shall become effective on the expiration of the period of time during which the Governor may veto the bill. If the bill is vetoed by the Governor and the veto is overridden, it shall become effective on the date the last house overrides the veto.”

Acts 1999, No. 1590, § 8: July 1, 1999. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the Eighty-second General Assembly that the Teacher Retirement System has reduced the amount of service credit needed for full retirement to twenty-eight (28) years of credited service, that the Teacher Deferred Retirement Option Plan is an important incentive to keep experienced teachers in the classroom rather than retiring completely, that experienced teachers are a valuable human resource and should be encouraged to stay in the classroom, and that the beginning of the state's fiscal year is the best time to implement any change in retirement benefits. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist and this act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall become effective on July 1, 1999.”

Acts 2001, No. 461, § 7: July 1, 2001. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that it is a necessity to set a normal retirement age for eligibility for retirement benefits in order to maintain the integrity of the Arkansas Teacher Retirement System; and that changes in legal provisions of the retirement system can most effectively be managed at the beginning of the state's fiscal year; and therefore this act should take effect with the beginning of the state's fiscal year. Therefore an emergency is declared to exist and this act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall become effective on July 1, 2001.”

Acts 2003, No. 991, § 2: July 1, 2003. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that the Teacher Deferred Retirement Option Plan is not presently cost neutral; that certain changes in the law governing plan contributions for members who reach normal retirement age or who have more than thirty (30) years of service and whose effective date in the plan is on or after September 1, 2003 are necessary to make it cost neutral; and that the most effective time to make changes to the retirement system is at the beginning of the state's fiscal year. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist and this act being necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on July 1, 2003.”

Acts 2003, No. 992, § 2: July 1, 2003. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that the Teacher Deferred Retirement Option Plan is not presently cost neutral; that certain changes in the law governing employer contributions are necessary to make it cost neutral; and that the most effective time to make changes to the retirement system is at the beginning of the state's fiscal year. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist and this act being necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on July 1, 2003.”

Acts 2005, No. 188, § 5: July 1, 2005. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that current Arkansas laws concerning the Teacher Retirement Deferred Option plan require clarity; that the nature of existing laws concerning the Teacher Retirement Deferred Option Plan complicates the operation of the Arkansas Teacher Retirement System and hinders the system in its efforts to serve its members; and that the most effective time to make change to the system is at the beginning of the state's fiscal year. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist and this act being necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on July 1, 2005.”

Acts 2007, No. 298, § 8: July 1, 2007. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that the current laws applicable to the Arkansas Teacher Retirement System regarding the deferred retirement option plan require revision; that revisions are necessary to ensure the effective and efficient operation of the system; and that the most effective time to make changes to the retirement system is at the beginning of the state’s fiscal year. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist and this act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on July 1, 2007.”

Acts 2009, No. 470, § 2:
July 1, 2009. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that certain provisions of the Arkansas Teacher Retirement System Act are badly in need of revision and updating to bring them into conformance with sound public pension policy; that such revision and updating is of great importance to members of the Arkansas Teacher Retirement System and to other citizens of the State of Arkansas; and that this act is immediately necessary in order to maintain an orderly system of benefits for the members of the Arkansas Teacher Retirement System. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist and this act being necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on July 1, 2009.”

Acts 2009, No. 743, § 8: July 1, 2009. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that certain provisions of the Arkansas Teacher Retirement System Act are badly in need of revision and updating to bring them into conformance with sound public pension policy; that such revision and updating is of great importance to members of the Arkansas Teacher Retirement System and to other citizens of the State of Arkansas; and that this act is immediately necessary in order to maintain an orderly system of benefits for the members of the Arkansas Teacher Retirement System. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist and this act being necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on July 1, 2009.”

Acts 2011, No. 45, § 22: Feb. 16, 2011. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that certain provisions of the Arkansas Teacher Retirement System statutes are in urgent need of revision to bring them into conformance with sound public pension policy; that this revision is of great importance to members of the Arkansas Teacher Retirement System and to other citizens of the State of Arkansas; that the Arkansas Teacher Retirement System assets and accounting are complex, and the system must be able to appropriately manage the system members accounts and benefits; that many of these technical corrections are currently the policy of the Board of Trustees of the Arkansas Teacher Retirement System and should be codified to reflect that policy; and that this act is immediately necessary to maintain an orderly system of benefits for the members of the Arkansas Teacher Retirement System. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist and this act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on: (1) The date of its approval by the Governor; (2) If the bill is neither approved nor vetoed by the Governor, the expiration of the period of time during which the Governor may veto the bill; or (3) If the bill is vetoed by the Governor and the veto is overridden, the date the last house overrides the veto.”

Acts 2011, No. 162, § 4: July 1, 2011. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that some provisions of the Arkansas Teacher Retirement System statutes are in urgent need of revision to bring them into conformance with sound public pension policy; that this revision is of great importance to members of the Arkansas Teacher Retirement System and to other citizens of the State of Arkansas; that members should have flexibility in electing how much of their plan they want to keep in the system to enable them to make wise investment decisions for their retirement; that plan deposits are made at the beginning of each fiscal year; and that this act is necessary to prevent great difficulty in administering benefits for the members of the system. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist and this act being necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on July 1, 2011.”

Acts 2013, No. 605, § 2: July 1, 2013. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that provisions of the Arkansas Teacher Retirement System Act are in need of revision to maintain the teacher retirement laws in conformance with sound public pension policy; that the Arkansas Teacher Retirement System operates on a July 1 to June 30 fiscal year; that a July 1, 2013, effective date is necessary to allow the provisions of this act to begin on the first day of the fiscal year and to provide proper administration of the system; that the revision helps clarify the law for the member's understanding and for the ease of administration; and that this act is necessary to maintain actuarial soundness and an orderly system of benefits for the members of the Arkansas Teacher Retirement System. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist, and this act being necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on July 1, 2013.”

Acts 2015, No. 301, § 11: Mar. 4, 2015. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that the operations of a state public retirement system are complex and the system must be able to meet the needs of its members as anticipated by the General Assembly; that certain provisions of the Arkansas Teacher Retirement System Act are imminently in need of clarification to operate the system efficiently and effectively; that such clarification is of great importance to members of the Arkansas Teacher Retirement System and to other citizens of the State of Arkansas; and that this act is immediately necessary in order to maintain an orderly system of benefits for the members of the Arkansas Teacher Retirement System. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist and this act being necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on: (1) The date of approval by the Governor; (2) If the bill is neither approved nor vetoed by the Governor, the expiration of the period of time during which the Governor may veto the bill; or (3) If the bill is vetoed by the Governor and the veto is overridden, the date the last house overrides the veto.”

Acts 2017, No. 243, § 5: Feb. 21, 2017. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that the operations of a state public retirement system are complex; that the Arkansas Teacher Retirement System must be able to meet the needs of its members as anticipated by the General Assembly; that certain provisions of the Arkansas Teacher Retirement System Act are imminently in need of revision and updating to bring them into conformance with sound public pension policy and actuarial requirements; that such revision and updating is of great importance to members of the system and to other citizens of the State of Arkansas; that the system needs to have the ability to make immediate changes to maintain and improve its actuarial status; and that this act is immediately necessary in order to maintain an orderly system of benefits for the members of the Arkansas Teacher Retirement System. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist, and this act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on: (1) The date of its approval by the Governor; (2) If the bill is neither approved nor vetoed by the Governor, the expiration of the period of time during which the Governor may veto the bill; or (3) If the bill is vetoed by the Governor and the veto is overridden, the date the last house overrides the veto.”

Acts 2017, No. 293, § 9: Feb. 28, 2017. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that the operations of the Arkansas Teacher Retirement System are complex; that the system must be able to meet the needs of its members as anticipated by the General Assembly; that certain provisions of the Arkansas Teacher Retirement System Act are imminently in need of revision and updating to bring them into conformance with sound public pension policy and actuarial requirements; that such revision and updating is of great importance to members of the system and to other citizens of the State of Arkansas; that the system needs to have the ability to make immediate changes to maintain and improve its actuarial status; and that this act is immediately necessary in order to maintain an orderly management of benefits for the members of the system. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist, and this act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on: (1) The date of its approval by the Governor; (2) If the bill is neither approved nor vetoed by the Governor, the expiration of the period of time during which the Governor may veto the bill; or (3) If the bill is vetoed by the Governor and the veto is overridden, the date the last house overrides the veto.”

Acts 2017, No. 750, § 3: Mar. 30, 2017. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that the operations of the Arkansas Teacher Retirement System are complex; that the system must be able to meet the needs of its members as anticipated by the General Assembly; that certain provisions of the Arkansas Teacher Retirement System Act are imminently in need of revision and updating to bring them into conformance with sound public pension policy and actuarial requirements; that such revision and updating is of great importance to members of the system and to other citizens of the State of Arkansas; that the system needs to have the ability to make immediate changes to maintain and improve its actuarial status; and that this act is immediately necessary in order to maintain an orderly management of benefits for the members of the system. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist, and this act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on: (1) The date of its approval by the Governor; (2) If the bill is neither approved nor vetoed by the Governor, the expiration of the period of time during which the Governor may veto the bill; or (3) If the bill is vetoed by the Governor and the veto is overridden, the date the last house overrides the veto.”

Acts 2017, No. 1049, § 3: Apr. 6, 2017. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that the operations of the Arkansas Teacher Retirement System are complex; that the system must be able to meet the needs of its members as anticipated by the General Assembly; that certain provisions of the Arkansas Teacher Retirement System Act are imminently in need of revision and updating to bring them into conformance with sound public pension policy and actuarial requirements; that such revision and updating is of great importance to members of the system and to other citizens of the State of Arkansas; that the system needs to have the ability to make immediate changes to maintain and improve its actuarial status; and that this act is immediately necessary in order to maintain an orderly management of benefits for the members of the system. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist, and this act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on: (1) The date of its approval by the Governor; (2) If the bill is neither approved nor vetoed by the Governor, the expiration of the period of time during which the Governor may veto the bill; or (3) If the bill is vetoed by the Governor and the veto is overridden, the date the last house overrides the veto.”

Acts 2019, No. 296, § 3: July 1, 2019. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that certain provisions of the Arkansas Teacher Retirement System Act, an act that created a state agency for the purpose of providing retirement benefits to school employees of the state, are in need of revision and updating to maintain the teacher retirement laws in conformance with sound public pension policy; that the Arkansas Teacher Retirement System operates on a fiscal year of July 1 to June 30; that a July 1, 2019 effective date is necessary to allow the provisions within this act to begin on the first day of the fiscal year to provide proper administration of the procedures referenced in this act; that the updates and revisions to the Arkansas Teacher Retirement System Act are of great importance for actuarial purposes and the protection of member benefits under the Arkansas Teacher Retirement System; and that this act is necessary in order to maintain an orderly system of benefits for the members of the Arkansas Teacher Retirement System. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist, and this act being necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on July 1, 2019”.

Acts 2019, No. 427, § 23: July 1, 2019. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that certain provisions of the Arkansas Teacher Retirement System Act, an act that created a state agency for the purpose of providing retirement benefits to school employees of the state, are in need of revision and updating to maintain the teacher retirement laws in conformance with sound public pension policy; that the Arkansas Teacher Retirement System operates on a fiscal year of July 1 to June 30; that a July 1, 2019 effective date is necessary to allow the provisions of this act to begin on the first day of the fiscal year and to provide for the proper administration of the Arkansas Teacher Retirement System; that the updates and revisions to the Arkansas Teacher Retirement System Act are of great importance for actuarial purposes and the protection of member benefits under the Arkansas Teacher Retirement System; and that this act is necessary in order to maintain an orderly system of benefits for the members of the Arkansas Teacher Retirement System. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist, and this act being necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on July 1, 2019”.

24-7-1301. Election to participate — Conditions.

In lieu of terminating employment and accepting a service retirement benefit pursuant to § 24-7-101 et seq., any person who is a member of the Arkansas Teacher Retirement System and who meets the conditions specified in subsection (b) of this section may elect to participate in the Teacher Deferred Retirement Option Plan and to defer the receipt of retirement benefits in accordance with the provisions of this subchapter.

The condition required for participation in the plan is that the member must have at least thirty (30) years of service credit in the system.

The Board of Trustees of the Arkansas Teacher Retirement System may promulgate rules necessary for the orderly administration of the plan, including without limitation the rules for eligibility for continuance of deposits for part-time employment.

History.

Acts 1995, No. 1096, § 1; 2011, No. 162, § 1.

Amendments.

The 2011 amendment added (c).

24-7-1302. Application — Review.

To participate in the Teacher Deferred Retirement Option Plan, the member shall submit a plan application on a form required by the Board of Trustees of the Arkansas Teacher Retirement System.

The member's plan application shall be reviewed by the Arkansas Teacher Retirement System within a reasonable period of time to determine whether or not the member meets the eligibility requirements under this subchapter.

The member's plan date shall be July 1 next following the determination that the member is eligible for plan participation.

A plan application received by the system after May 31 before the beginning of a fiscal year on July 1 shall not be eligible for participation in the plan until the following July 1.

The member may withdraw his or her plan application if notice to withdraw is received by the system no later than two (2) calendar months after the member's plan date.

History.

Acts 1995, No. 1096, § 1; 1997, No. 118, § 1; 2007, No. 298, § 1; 2011, No. 45, § 19.

Amendments.

The 2011 amendment rewrote (a); in (b)(1), inserted “by the system”, substituted “to determine” for “and a determination shall be made”, and “under” for “specified in”; and added (b)(3) and (c).

24-7-1303. Contributions to Arkansas Teacher Retirement System.

When a member begins participation in the Teacher Deferred Retirement Option Plan, member contributions to the Arkansas Teacher Retirement System shall cease.

Until and on August 31, 2003, employer contributions on behalf of the members participating in the Teacher Deferred Retirement Option Plan that are due the system may be retained by the school districts for the purposes under subdivision (b)(1) of this section.

Beginning September 1, 2003, for members whose effective date in the Teacher Deferred Retirement Option Plan is before September 1, 2003, the employer contribution rate to the system on behalf of all members in the Teacher Deferred Retirement Option Plan shall recommence at the rate of:

One percent (1%) for the period from July 1, 2003, through June 30, 2005;

Three percent (3%) for the period from July 1, 2005, through June 30, 2007; and

Six percent (6%) for the period from July 1, 2007, through June 30, 2009.

After July 1, 2009, the covered employer shall remit the contributions on all salary paid to the Teacher Deferred Retirement Option Plan participants in amount equal to the employer contribution rate applicable to active members.

The portion of the employer contribution not required to be paid to the system for members in the Teacher Deferred Retirement Option Plan under this subdivision (a)(3), if any, may be retained by the school districts for the purposes under subdivision (b)(1) of this section.

Beginning September 1, 2003, for members whose effective date in the Teacher Deferred Retirement Option Plan is on or after September 1, 2003, the employer contribution rate on behalf of members in the Teacher Deferred Retirement Option Plan shall continue at the rate established by the entity having the authority to set the employer contribution rates for the system.

It is the intent of the General Assembly that the portion of the employer contribution to the system that has ceased for a participant in the Teacher Deferred Retirement Option Plan, if any, will become a part of the general operating fund of the school district to be used for any purpose, including employee salaries.

Except for employer contributions to the system, the school district shall not make contributions to any tax-qualified retirement plan on behalf of any employee participating in the Teacher Deferred Retirement Option Plan. However, this prohibition shall not be applicable to the extent necessary to comply with contractual obligations incurred by a school district prior to February 1, 1999.

History.

Acts 1995, No. 1096, § 1; 1999, No. 773, § 1; 2003, No. 992, § 1; 2007, No. 298, § 2; 2009, No. 743, § 7.

Amendments.

The 2009 amendment redesignated (a)(3)(A), deleted former (a)(3)(A)(iv) through (a)(3)(A)(vi), and inserted present (a)(3)(A)(ii).

24-7-1304. Election of annuity options.

A member who elects participation in the Teacher Deferred Retirement Option Plan may elect one (1) of the annuity options provided in § 24-7-706.

The election will be made at the time the member separates from service and is granted a monthly retirement benefit, and will be deemed to apply to the member's plan benefit as well as to the member's monthly retirement benefit from the Arkansas Teacher Retirement System at the time it becomes payable.

History.

Acts 1995, No. 1096, § 1; 1997, No. 118, § 2.

24-7-1305. Benefits.

The member's Teacher Deferred Retirement Option Plan benefit shall be the monthly benefit to which the member would have been entitled if the member had actually retired on the plan date without regard to the provisions of § 24-7-708 related to conditions subjecting annuities to limitations.

History.

Acts 1995, No. 1096, § 1; 2003, No. 659, § 1.

24-7-1306. Amount of deposits.

Teacher Deferred Retirement Option Plan deposits shall be a percentage of the plan benefit.

If a plan participant has at least thirty (30) years of credited service in the Arkansas Teacher Retirement System, including combined service with a reciprocal system, a plan deposit shall be calculated beginning with the participant's plan benefit and then reduced by one percent (1%) for each year of credited service, including fractions of a year.

If a plan participant has at least twenty-eight (28) years of credited service but fewer than thirty (30) years of credited service in the Arkansas Teacher Retirement System, including combined service with a reciprocal system, the Board of Trustees of the Arkansas Teacher Retirement System may authorize early participation in the plan.

The plan deposit of the early participant shall be calculated beginning with the plan benefit of the early participant, then initially reduced by one percent (1%) for each year of credited service, including fractions of a year, and then may be further reduced by at least an additional five-tenths of one percent (0.5%) but no more than one percent (1%) of the initially reduced plan deposit for each month of credited service under thirty (30) years.

The Board of Trustees of the Arkansas Teacher Retirement System is authorized to make further adjustments to the plan by board resolution to make it cost-neutral to the Arkansas Teacher Retirement System.

History.

Acts 1995, No. 1096, § 1; 1997, No. 953, § 1; 2001, No. 461, § 5; 2003, No. 991, § 1; 2005, No. 188, § 1; 2007, No. 298, § 3; 2011, No. 162, § 2; 2013, No. 605, § 1; 2019, No. 296, § 1.

Amendments.

The 2011 amendment, in (b)(1), inserted “and reciprocal,” “in the Arkansas Teacher Retirement System,” and “in the system.”

The 2013 amendment, in (b)(1), deleted “contributory and” preceding “reciprocal service,” substituted “and credited service” for “credit,” and deleted “and further reduced by the product of six-tenths percent (0.6%) multiplied by the number of years of noncontributory service credit and fractions thereof in the system”; and substituted “participant” for “member” in (b)(2)(B).

The 2019 amendment rewrote the section.

24-7-1307. Account — Credit.

The member's Teacher Deferred Retirement Option Plan account shall be the account in which shall be accumulated the:

Plan deposits made on behalf of the member; and

Plan interest.

At the end of each fiscal year, the Board of Trustees of the Arkansas Teacher Retirement System shall credit each plan participant's plan account with plan interest on the mean balance in the account for the fiscal year.

The board shall determine the plan interest rate to members' plan accounts based on:

A fixed interest rate that is adopted by board resolution prior to the beginning of the fiscal year and which applies to subsequent fiscal years unless modified by the board; or

A variable interest rate formula that is based on investment returns and other factors adopted by board resolution prior to the beginning of the fiscal year.

If the board uses a variable interest rate formula, the board shall adopt by board resolution the plan interest rate prior to the beginning of the fiscal year in which the plan interest rate applies.

In addition to the applicable interest rate for the fiscal year, the board may adopt by board resolution a Teacher Deferred Retirement Option Plan participation incentive rate during a fiscal year if investment returns justify an incentive rate for the fiscal year.

If a participant continues covered employment after completing ten (10) consecutive years in the plan, the participant's plan account shall be credited on June 30 of each year or through the date of retirement, whichever occurs first, with ten (10) year plus plan interest as set by the board.

For the purposes of this section, the ten (10) year plus plan interest rate shall be the rate determined to be appropriate by the board and adopted by board resolution prior to the beginning of the fiscal year in which the interest rate shall apply.

History.

Acts 1995, No. 1096, § 1; 2005, No. 188, § 2; 2011, No. 45, § 20; 2017, No. 1049, §§ 1, 2; 2019, No. 427, § 20.

Amendments.

The 2011 amendment added (d) and (e).

The 2017 amendment rewrote (c); and substituted “to be appropriate by the board and adopted by board resolution prior to the beginning of the fiscal year in which the interest rate shall apply” for “by the board as appropriate” in (e).

The 2019 amendment inserted “or through the date of retirement, whichever occurs first” in (d).

24-7-1308. Termination of participation in Teacher Deferred Retirement Option Plan — Distribution options.

The member's participation in the Teacher Deferred Retirement Option Plan shall cease when the member files an application for voluntary retirement with the Arkansas Teacher Retirement System under § 24-7-701 and is granted a monthly retirement benefit by the system.

The system shall cancel a plan participant's retirement benefits, and the plan participant forfeits any retirement benefits, including plan account benefits, if the participant:

Fails to meet the termination of employment requirement of § 24-7-701; and

Has not reached normal retirement age.

A plan participant becomes eligible again for retirement benefits, including plan account benefits, when the termination requirements are met.

When the member's participation in the plan ceases, the member may elect to:

Receive the balance in the plan account as a lump sum;

Annuitize the plan account as a monthly benefit paid under the annuity option selected by the member; or

Receive a part of the balance in the plan account as a lump sum and annuitize the remaining balance.

A member who selects the option under subdivision (b)(1)(C) of this section may receive his or her account distribution as follows:

Seventy-five percent (75%) in a lump-sum payment and twenty-five percent (25%) annuitized;

Fifty percent (50%) in a lump-sum payment and the remaining fifty percent (50%) annuitized; or

Twenty-five percent (25%) in a lump-sum payment and seventy-five percent (75%) annuitized.

The Board of Trustees of the Arkansas Teacher Retirement System shall:

Determine factors to be used for the conversion of plan balances to monthly amounts;

Set requirements for the member's election under this subsection; and

Modify the options under subdivision (b)(1) of this section by rule as necessary.

When the member's participation in the plan ceases, the board shall cause the member's plan benefit to be paid directly to the member in the form of regular monthly amounts in the same amount and manner as would have been the case if the member had retired on the plan date and had made the same election under § 24-7-706 that was made on or before the plan date.

A member who fails to meet the termination requirements and receives retirement benefits shall repay any benefits received before becoming eligible again for voluntary retirement.

If the member becomes eligible to receive the plan account distribution before the system collects it back from the member, the system may charge interest on the distribution for the time the member was ineligible to receive the distribution.

The system may offset, adjust, or otherwise collect any benefits overpaid to a member under this subchapter.

History.

Acts 1995, No. 1096, § 1; 2007, No. 298, § 4; 2009, No. 470, § 1; 2011, No. 162, § 3.

Amendments.

The 2009 amendment, in (a), inserted (a)(2), redesignated the remaining text accordingly, and substituted “files an application for voluntary retirement with the system under § 24-7-701 and” for “separates from service or” in (a)(1); substituted “this subchapter” for “§ 24-7-1304” in (b)(1); added (d) and (e); and made minor stylistic changes.

The 2011 amendment subdivided (b)(1) as (b)(1)(A) and (B) and inserted (C); in present (b)(1)(B), added “Annuitize the plan account as” and deleted “under this subchapter” at the end; inserted (b)(2) and redesignated the remaining subdivisions accordingly; subdivided present (b)(3) as (b)(3)(A); and added (b)(3)(B) and (C).

24-7-1309. Benefits from Arkansas Teacher Retirement System.

In the event that a Teacher Deferred Retirement Option Plan participant applies for benefits from the Arkansas Teacher Retirement System pursuant to § 24-7-704 related to disability retirement, the application shall be treated as an application for voluntary retirement pursuant to § 24-7-701, and no benefits other than those that would be payable without regard to the disability shall become payable.

History.

Acts 1995, No. 1096, § 1.

24-7-1310. Death of participant.

In the event that a Teacher Deferred Retirement Option Plan participant dies, the benefits payable from the plan shall be determined according to § 24-7-710 and the rules and resolutions of the Arkansas Teacher Retirement System.

However, the plan participant's eligible surviving spouse may choose to receive the plan benefit in a lump sum without affecting the payment of a monthly retirement benefit from the Arkansas Teacher Retirement System.

Subdivision (b)(1) of this section shall not apply if the member has directed one (1) or more residual beneficiaries under § 24-7-710.

If a member has directed one (1) or more residual beneficiaries, the residual beneficiary shall receive the residual benefits payable, and the spousal benefit shall not be paid.

For the purposes of § 24-7-709, any amounts received from the Teacher Deferred Retirement Option Plan account in the form of lump-sum or annuity payments shall be considered to be annuity payments received by the member or his or her designated beneficiary and shall reduce or eliminate the disposition of residue that, except for the provisions of this subsection, would have been paid under § 24-7-709.

History.

Acts 1995, No. 1096, § 1; 1997, No. 118, § 3; 2005, No. 188, § 3; 2007, No. 298, § 5; 2017, No. 243, §
4; 2017, No. 293, §
8.

Amendments.

The 2017 amendment by No. 243 redesignated (b) as (b)(1); in (b)(1), inserted “eligible” and substituted “payment of a monthly retirement benefit” for “monthly retirement benefit payable”; and added (b)(2).

The 2017 amendment by No. 293 added “and the rules and resolutions of the Arkansas Teacher Retirement System” at the end of (a).

24-7-1311. Term of participation in Teacher Deferred Retirement Option Plan.

The Arkansas Teacher Retirement System's monthly deposit into the member's Teacher Deferred Retirement Option Plan shall not exceed one (1) plan term of ten (10) consecutive years, beginning with the member's plan date.

Once a member participates in the plan, the member shall no longer accrue service credit under any state-supported retirement system, even if the member returns to work.

History.

Acts 1995, No. 1096, § 1; 2007, No. 298, § 6; 2011, No. 45, § 21.

Amendments.

The 2011 amendment rewrote the section.

24-7-1312. Federal taxation.

The Teacher Deferred Retirement Option Plan is intended to operate in accordance with 26 U.S.C. § 415 and other applicable sections of the Internal Revenue Code in a manner that protects the tax-qualified status of the system.

Any provision of the plan that is found to be in conflict with an applicable provision of the Internal Revenue Code is hereby declared null and void.

History.

Acts 1995, No. 1096, § 2; 2015, No. 301, § 10.

Amendments.

The 2015 amendment added “in a manner that protects the tax-qualified status of the system” to the end of (a).